src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@sähviv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´ähviv MAGUS ;
säilitav+A:säilitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@säiliv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´äiliv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@särav+A:@P.NomStem.First@särav MAGUS ;
sätendav+A:sätendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sööbiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´ööbiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@söödav+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´öödav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sööv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´ööv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sügav+A:@P.NomStem.First@sügav MAGUS ;
sülitav+A:sülitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@sündiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´ün,div MAGUS ;
sünteesiv+A:sünt´eesiv MAGUS ;
sütitav+A:süt,itav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@süttiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´üt,tiv MAGUS ;
süvenev+A:süvenev MAGUS ;
süüdistatav+A:süüdistatav MAGUS ;
süüdistav+A:süüdistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@süüdiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@s´üüdiv MAGUS ;
šokeeriv+A:šok´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@taanduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´aanduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@taaruv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´aaruv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@taastav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´aastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@taastuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´aastuv MAGUS ;
tabatav+A:tabatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tabav+A:@P.NomStem.First@tabav MAGUS ;
tagandatav+A:tagandatav MAGUS ;
taganev+A:taganev MAGUS ;
tagastatav+A:tagastatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tagav+A:@P.NomStem.First@tagav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@taipav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´aipav MAGUS ;
tajutav+A:tajutav MAGUS ;
takerduv+A:takerduv MAGUS ;
takistav+A:takistav MAGUS ;
taltsutatav+A:taltsutatav MAGUS ;
talutav+A:talutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tammuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ammuv MAGUS ;
tantsisklev+A:tan,tsisklev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@taotlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´aotlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarbiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´arbiv MAGUS ;
targutav+A:targutav MAGUS ;
targutlev+A:targutlev MAGUS ;
tarvitatav+A:tarvitatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tasuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@tasuv MAGUS ;
taunitav+A:taunitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tauniv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´auniv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@teatav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´eatav MAGUS ;
teenindav+A:teenindav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@teeniv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´eeniv MAGUS ;
tegelev+A:tegelev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tegev+A:@P.NomStem.First@tegev MAGUS ;
tegutsev+A:tegutsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tehtav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ehtav MAGUS ;
tekitav+A:tekitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tekkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ekkiv MAGUS ;
teostatav+A:t´eostatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@teostav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´eostav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@terav+A:@P.NomStem.First@terav MAGUS ;
tervitatav+A:tervitatav MAGUS ;
tihenev+A:tihenev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tilkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ilkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tingiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ingiv MAGUS ;
toetatav+A:t´oetatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toetuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oetuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toibuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oibuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toimiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oimiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toimuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oimuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toodav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oodav MAGUS ;
toodetav+A:toodetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@toov+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´oov MAGUS ;
toretsev+A:toretsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@torkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´orkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@torkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´orkiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tormav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ormav MAGUS ;
tormitsev+A:tormitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tormlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ormlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tossav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ossav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@trotsiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@tr´ot,siv MAGUS ;
tudisev+A:tudisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tugev+A:@P.NomStem.First@tugev MAGUS ;
tuginev+A:tuginev MAGUS ;
tuhisev+A:tuhisev MAGUS ;
tujutsev+A:tujutsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tukkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ukkuv MAGUS ;
tulenev+A:tulenev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tulev+A:@P.NomStem.First@tulev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tulvav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ulvav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tundlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´undlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tunduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´unduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tungiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ungiv MAGUS ;
tunnetatav+A:tunnetatav MAGUS ;
tunnustatav+A:tunnustatav MAGUS ;
tunnustav+A:tunnustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tuntav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´untav MAGUS ;
turgutav+A:turgutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tuttav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´uttav MAGUS ;
tutvustav+A:tutvustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõendav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õendav MAGUS ;
tõestatav+A:t´õestatav MAGUS ;
tõkestav+A:tõkestav MAGUS ;
tõlgendatav+A:tõlgendatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõmbav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õmbav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõmblev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õmblev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõmbuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õmbuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõotav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õotav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõrjuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õrjuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõrkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õrkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõtlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õtlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõttav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õttav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tõukav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´õukav MAGUS ;
täheldatav+A:täheldatav MAGUS ;
täidetav+A:täidetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@täiendav+A:@P.NomStem.First@täiendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@täituv+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´äituv MAGUS ;
täpsustav+A:täpsustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tärkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´ärkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tögav+A:@P.NomStem.First@tögav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@töötav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´öötav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@töötlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´öötlev MAGUS ;
tülgastav+A:tülgastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tüssav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´üssav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tüütav+A:@P.NomStem.First@t´üütav MAGUS ;
uimastav+A:uimastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@uinuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´uinuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ujuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@ujuv MAGUS ;
ulatuv+A:ulatuv MAGUS ;
uljutsev+A:ul,jutsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ulpiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ul,piv MAGUS ;
unistav+A:unistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@uppuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´uppuv MAGUS ;
usaldatav+A:usaldatav MAGUS ;
usaldav+A:usaldav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ustav+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ustav MAGUS ;
uudistav+A:uudistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@uuriv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´uuriv MAGUS ;
vaadeldav+A:vaadeldav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaagiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´aagiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaatav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´aatav MAGUS ;
vabandatav+A:vabandatav MAGUS ;
vabandav+A:vabandav MAGUS ;
vabanev+A:vabanev MAGUS ;
vabastav+A:vabastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaevav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´aevav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaevlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´aevlev MAGUS ;
vahelduv+A:vahelduv MAGUS ;
vahetatav+A:vahetatav MAGUS ;
vahetuv+A:vahetuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vahtiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ahtiv MAGUS ;
vahutav+A:vahutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaieldav+A:@P.NomStem.First@vaieldav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaikiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´aikiv MAGUS ;
vaimustav+A:vaimustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vajav+A:@P.NomStem.First@vajav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vajuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@vajuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@valdav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´aldav MAGUS ;
valendav+A:valendav MAGUS ;
valetav+A:valetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@valev+A:@P.NomStem.First@valev MAGUS ;
valgustav+A:valgustav MAGUS ;
valitav+A:valitav MAGUS ;
valitsev+A:valitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@valiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@valiv MAGUS ;
valjenev+A:val,jenev MAGUS ;
vallandatav+A:vallandatav MAGUS ;
vallutav+A:vallutav MAGUS ;
valmistatav+A:val,mistatav MAGUS ;
valmistuv+A:val,mistuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@valmiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´al,miv MAGUS ;
valutav+A:valutav MAGUS ;
vananev+A:vananev MAGUS ;
vangistav+A:vangistav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vankuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ankuv MAGUS ;
vapustav+A:vapustav MAGUS ;
varastav+A:varastav MAGUS ;
varisev+A:varisev MAGUS ;
varitsev+A:varitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@varjav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´arjav MAGUS ;
vastanduv+A:vastanduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vastav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´astav MAGUS ;
vastutav+A:vastutav MAGUS ;
